Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.065

Reports to the citizen commission—Reports to the legislature—Public hearings.

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report its findings and recommendations for scheduled tax preferences to the citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences by August 30th of each year. The commission may review and comment on the report of the committee. The committee may revise its report based on the comments of the commission. The committee shall prepare a final report that includes the comments of the commission and submit the final report to the finance committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate by December 30th.

(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit a special report reviewing all tax preferences that have statutory expiration dates between June 30, 2005, and January 1, 2007. For the special report, the committee shall complete a review under RCW 43.136.055, and obtain comments of the citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences under subsection (1) of this section, to the extent possible. The committee shall submit the special report to the finance committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate by January 12, 2006.

(3) Following receipt of a report under this section, the finance committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate shall jointly hold a public hearing to consider the final report and any related data.

[ 2006 c 197 s 6.]